test/src/dict-gt-yamls/U-sanit_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - rášku: # ok LAIGU
    rášku+N+Sg+Nom:  rášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Gen:  ráášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Acc:  ráášku
    rášku+N+Sg+Ill:  rááškun
    rášku+N+Sg+Loc:  rááškust
    rášku+N+Sg+Com:  ráškoin
    rášku+N+Sg+Abe:  ráˊškuttáá
    rášku+N+Ess:  ráškun
    rášku+N+Par:  ráškud
    rášku+N+Pl+Nom:  rááškuh
    rášku+N+Pl+Gen: [rááškui, ráˊškui]
    rášku+N+Pl+Acc:  rááškuid
    rášku+N+Pl+Ill:  ráškoid
    rášku+N+Pl+Loc:  rááškuin
    rášku+N+Pl+Com:  ráˊškuiguin
    rášku+N+Pl+Abe:  ráˊškuittáá

  Noun - máksu+v1: # ok; SgCom + PlIll cehcked with Ilmari Mattus; IM: vs; MLO: vss; both are in use LAIGU
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  máksu
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  máávsu
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  máávsu
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  mááksun
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  máávsust
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Com:  mávsoin
    máksu+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊvsuttáá
    máksu+v1+N+Ess:  máksun
    máksu+v1+N+Par:  máksud
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  máávsuh
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [máávsui, máˊvsui]
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  máávsuid
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  mávsoid
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  máávsuin
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Com:  máˊvsuiguin
    máksu+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊvsuittáá

  Noun - haalu: # ok MAANU
    haalu+N+Sg+Nom:  haaḷu
    haalu+N+Sg+Gen:  haalu
    haalu+N+Sg+Acc:  haalu
    haalu+N+Sg+Ill:  haaḷun
    haalu+N+Sg+Loc:  haalust
    haalu+N+Sg+Com:  haaluin
    haalu+N+Sg+Abe:  haˊluttáá
    haalu+N+Ess:  haallun
    haalu+N+Par:  haallud
    haalu+N+Pl+Nom:  haaluh
    haalu+N+Pl+Gen: [haalui, haˊlui]
    haalu+N+Pl+Acc:  haaluid
    haalu+N+Pl+Ill:  haaluid
    haalu+N+Pl+Loc:  haaluin
    haalu+N+Pl+Com:  haˊluiguin
    haalu+N+Pl+Abe:  haˊluittáá

  Noun - kiilu: # ok MAANU
    kiilu+N+Sg+Nom:  kiiḷu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Gen:  kiilu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Acc:  kiilu
    kiilu+N+Sg+Ill:  kiiḷun
    kiilu+N+Sg+Loc:  kiilust
    kiilu+N+Sg+Com:  kiiluin
    kiilu+N+Sg+Abe:  kiˊluttáá
    kiilu+N+Ess:  kiillun
    kiilu+N+Par:  kiillud
    kiilu+N+Pl+Nom:  kiiluh
    kiilu+N+Pl+Gen:  [kiilui, kiˊlui]
    kiilu+N+Pl+Acc:  kiiluid
    kiilu+N+Pl+Ill:  kiiluid
    kiilu+N+Pl+Loc:  kiiluin
    kiilu+N+Pl+Com:  kiˊluiguin
    kiilu+N+Pl+Abe:  kiˊluittáá

  Noun - piiru: # ok MAANU
    piiru+N+Sg+Nom:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Gen:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Acc:  piiru
    piiru+N+Sg+Ill:  piirun
    piiru+N+Sg+Loc:  piirust
    piiru+N+Sg+Com:  piiruin
    piiru+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊruttáá
    piiru+N+Ess:  piirrun
    piiru+N+Par:  piirrud
    piiru+N+Pl+Nom:  piiruh
    piiru+N+Pl+Gen: [piirui, piˊrui]
    piiru+N+Pl+Acc:  piiruid
    piiru+N+Pl+Ill:  piiruid
    piiru+N+Pl+Loc:  piiruin
    piiru+N+Pl+Com:  piˊruiguin
    piiru+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊruittáá

  Noun - niisu: # ok MAANU
    niisu+N+Sg+Nom:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Gen:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Acc:  niisu
    niisu+N+Sg+Ill:  niisun
    niisu+N+Sg+Loc:  niisust
    niisu+N+Sg+Com:  niisuin
    niisu+N+Sg+Abe:  niˊsuttáá
    niisu+N+Ess:  niissun
    niisu+N+Par:  niissud
    niisu+N+Pl+Nom:  niisuh
    niisu+N+Pl+Gen: [niisui, niˊsui]
    niisu+N+Pl+Acc:  niisuid
    niisu+N+Pl+Ill:  niisuid
    niisu+N+Pl+Loc:  niisuin
    niisu+N+Pl+Com:  niˊsuiguin
    niisu+N+Pl+Abe:  niˊsuittáá

  Noun - máánu: # ok MAANU
    máánu+N+Sg+Nom:  mááṇu
    máánu+N+Sg+Gen:  máánu
    máánu+N+Sg+Acc:  máánu
    máánu+N+Sg+Ill:  mááṇun
    máánu+N+Sg+Loc:  máánust
    máánu+N+Sg+Com:  máánuin
    máánu+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊnuttáá
    máánu+N+Ess:  máánnun
    máánu+N+Par:  máánnud
    máánu+N+Pl+Nom:  máánuh
    máánu+N+Pl+Gen:  [máánui, máˊnui]
    máánu+N+Pl+Acc:  máánuid
    máánu+N+Pl+Ill:  máánuid
    máánu+N+Pl+Loc:  máánuin
    máánu+N+Pl+Com:  máˊnuiguin
    máánu+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊnuittáá

  Noun - kiäčču: # ok SUAITTU
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Nom:  kiäčˊču
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Gen:  kiäj̣u
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Acc:  kiäj̣u
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Ill:  kiäčun
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Loc:  kiäj̣ust
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Com:  kiäijoin
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊjuttáá
    kiäčču+N+Ess:  kiäčˊčun
    kiäčču+N+Par:  kiäčˊčud
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Nom:  kiäj̣uh
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Gen: [kiäj̣ui, kiäˊj̣ui]
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Acc:  kiäj̣uid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Ill:  kiäijoid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Loc:  kiäj̣uin
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊjuiguin
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊjuittáá

  Noun - suáittu: # ok SUAITTU
    suáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  suáiˊttu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  suáitu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Acc:  suáitu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  suáitun
    suáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  suáitust
    suáittu+N+Sg+Com:  suáiˊttoin
    suáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  suáˊituttáá
    suáittu+N+Ess:  suáiˊttun
    suáittu+N+Par:  suáiˊttud
    suáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  suáituh
    suáittu+N+Pl+Gen: [suáitui, suáˊitui]
    suáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  suáituid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  suáiˊttoid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  suáituin
    suáittu+N+Pl+Com:  suáˊituiguin
    suáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  suáˊituittáá

  Noun - suánju: # ok; nj is actually one consonant; might cause some troubles with WG. 
    suánju+N+Sg+Nom:  suáṇju
    suánju+N+Sg+Gen:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Acc:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Ill:  suáṇjun
    suánju+N+Sg+Loc:  suánjust
    suánju+N+Sg+Com:  suánjoin
    suánju+N+Sg+Abe:  suáˊnjuttáá
    suánju+N+Ess:  suánnjun
    suánju+N+Par:  suánnjud
    suánju+N+Pl+Nom:  suánjuh
    suánju+N+Pl+Gen: [suánjui, suáˊnjui]
    suánju+N+Pl+Acc:  suánjuid
    suánju+N+Pl+Ill:  suánjoid
    suánju+N+Pl+Loc:  suánjuin
    suánju+N+Pl+Com:  suáˊnjuiguin
    suánju+N+Pl+Abe:  suáˊnjuittáá

  Noun - juávkku: # ok SUAITTU
    juávkku+N+Sg+Nom:  juávˊkku
    juávkku+N+Sg+Gen:  juávhu
    juávkku+N+Sg+Acc:  juávhu
    juávkku+N+Sg+Ill:  juávkun
    juávkku+N+Sg+Loc:  juávhust
    juávkku+N+Sg+Com:  juávˊhoin
    juávkku+N+Sg+Abe:  juáˊvhuttáá
    juávkku+N+Ess:  juávˊkkun
    juávkku+N+Par:  juávˊkkud
    juávkku+N+Pl+Nom:  juávhuh
    juávkku+N+Pl+Gen: [juávhui, juáˊvhui]
    juávkku+N+Pl+Acc:  juávhuid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Ill:  juávˊhoid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Loc:  juávhuin
    juávkku+N+Pl+Com:  juáˊvhuiguin
    juávkku+N+Pl+Abe:  juáˊvhuittáá

  Noun - puákku: # ok SUAITTU
    puákku+N+Sg+Nom:  puákˊku
    puákku+N+Sg+Gen:  puáhu
    puákku+N+Sg+Acc:  puáhu
    puákku+N+Sg+Ill:  puákun
    puákku+N+Sg+Loc:  puáhust
    puákku+N+Sg+Com:  puáhˊhoin
    puákku+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊhuttáá
    puákku+N+Ess:  puákˊkun
    puákku+N+Par:  puákˊkud
    puákku+N+Pl+Nom:  puáhuh
    puákku+N+Pl+Gen:  [puáhui, puáˊhui]
    puákku+N+Pl+Acc:  puáhuid
    puákku+N+Pl+Ill:  puáhˊhoid
    puákku+N+Pl+Loc:  puáhuin
    puákku+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊhuiguin
    puákku+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊhuittáá

  Noun - ruávvu: # ok SUAITTU
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruávˊvu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruáṿu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruáṿun
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruáṿust
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Com:  ruávˊvoin
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruáˊvuttáá
    ruávvu+N+Ess:  ruávˊvun
    ruávvu+N+Par:  ruávˊvud
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruáṿuh
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Gen:  [ruáṿui, ruáˊṿui]
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruáṿuid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruávˊvoid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruáṿuin
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Com:  ruáˊṿuiguin
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruáˊṿuittáá


  Noun - vuálppu: # ok SUAITTU
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuálˊppu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuálpu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuálpu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuálpun
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuálpust
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Com:  vuálˊppoin
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊlputtáá
    vuálppu+N+Ess:  vuálˊppun
    vuálppu+N+Par:  vuálˊppud
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuálpuh
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Gen:  [vuálpui, vuáˊlpui]
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuálpuid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuálˊppoid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuálpuin
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊlpuiguin
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊlpuittáá

  Noun - vuáru+v2: # ok LAAVU2 vuá%^RDr7%^RCu
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáṛu
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáˊro
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáˊro
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáṛun
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  vuáˊroost
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Com:  vuáˊroin
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊrottáá
    vuáru+v2+N+Ess:  vuárrun
    vuáru+v2+N+Par:  vuárrud
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáˊroh
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  vuáˊroi
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáˊroid
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  vuáˊroid
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáˊroin
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊroiguin
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊroittáá
    
  Noun - puáđu+v2: # ok puá%^RDđ7%^RCu
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  puáđ̣u
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  puáˊđo
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  puáˊđo
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  puáđ̣un
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  puáˊđoost
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  puáˊđoin
    puáđu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊđottáá
    puáđu+v2+N+Ess:  puáđđun
    puáđu+v2+N+Par:  puáđđud
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  puáˊđoh
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  puáˊđoi
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  puáˊđoid
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  puáˊđoid
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  puáˊđoin
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊđoiguin
    puáđu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊđoittáá

  Noun - muátu+v2: # ok LAAVU muá%^RDt%^RC
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  muátu
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  muáˊđo
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  muáˊđo
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  muátun
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  muáˊđoost
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  muáˊđoin
    muátu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  muáˊđottáá
    muátu+v2+N+Ess:  muáttun
    muátu+v2+N+Par:  muáttud
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  muáˊđoh
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  muáˊđoi
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  muáˊđoid
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  muáˊđoid
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  muáˊđoin
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  muáˊđoiguin
    muátu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  muáˊđoittáá

  Noun - táálu+v2: # ok táál7%^RCu
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  tááḷu 
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  táˊlo
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  táˊlo
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  tááḷun
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  tááloost
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  [táˊloin, tááloin]
    táálu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  táˊlottáá
    táálu+v2+N+Ess:  táállun
    táálu+v2+N+Par:  táállud
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  táˊloh
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  [tááloi, táˊloi]
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  táˊloid
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  táˊloid
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  táˊloin
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  táˊloiguin
    táálu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  táˊloittáá

  Noun - stáálu+v2: # ok stáál7%^RCu
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  stááḷu
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  stáˊlo
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  stáˊlo
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  stááḷun
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  stááloost
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  [stááloin, stáˊloin]
    stáálu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  stáˊlottáá
    stáálu+v2+N+Ess:  stáállun
    stáálu+v2+N+Par:  stáállud
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  stáˊloh
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  [stááloi, stáˊloi]
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  stáˊloid
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  stááloid
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  stáˊloin
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  stáˊloiguin
    stáálu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  stáˊloittáá

  Noun - láátu+v2: # ok láát%^RCu
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  láátu
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  láˊđo
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  láˊđo
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  láátun
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  lááđoost
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  lááđoin
    láátu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  láˊđottáá
    láátu+v2+N+Ess:  lááttun
    láátu+v2+N+Par:  lááttud
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  láˊđoh
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Gen:  láˊđoi
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  láˊđoid
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  lááđoid
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  láˊđoin
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  láˊđoiguin
    láátu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  láˊđoittáá

  Noun - pááru+v2: # ok páár7%^RCu
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  pááṛu
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  páˊro
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Acc:  páˊro
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  pááṛun
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  páároost
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Com:  páˊroin
    pááru+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  páˊrottáá
    pááru+v2+N+Ess:  páárrun
    pááru+v2+N+Par:  páárrud
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  páˊroh
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Gen: páˊroi
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  [páˊroid, páároid]
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  [páˊroid, páároid]
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  páˊroin
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Com:  páˊroiguin
    pááru+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊroittáá

  Noun - máátu+v2: # ok máát%^RCu
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Nom:  máátu
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Gen:  máˊđo
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Ill:  máátun
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Loc:  mááđoost
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Com:  máˊđoin
    máátu+v2+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊđottáá
    máátu+v2+N+Ess:  mááttun
    máátu+v2+N+Par:  mááttud
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Nom:  máˊđoh
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Gen: máˊđoi
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Acc:  máˊđoid
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Ill:  máˊđoid
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Loc:  máˊđoin
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Com:  máˊđoiguin
    máátu+v2+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊđoittáá
